tree-sitter-lexd/test/highlight/basic.lexd
PATTERNS
# <- keyword.control
( X(1) | [ab:cd]+ )
# <- keyword.operator
#   ^ constant.number
#      ^ keyword.operator
#        ^ keyword.operator
#         ^ string.quoted
#           ^ keyword.operator
#            ^ string.quoted
#              ^ keyword.operator
#               ^ keyword.operator
#                 ^ keyword.operator

LEXICON X
a<b>c:d>e{f}
# <- string.quoted
# ^ constant
#   ^ string.quoted
#    ^ keyword.operator
#     ^ string.quoted
#      ^ variable
#       ^ string.quoted
#         ^ variable
